Massachusetts, session 194th, S2399.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8E of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
The regulations establishing criteria for identification cards shall include a process for a
person who is homeless or is an unaccompanied homeless youth to apply for a Massachusetts
identification card and to waive any fees associated with obtaining the identification card;
provided, however, that the process shall allow for a person who is homeless or is an
unaccompanied homeless youth to submit proof of residency by providing documentation that is
satisfactory to the registrar and that is: (i) from an entity that provides housing services or youth
services in the commonwealth, including, but not limited to, homeless service providers; or (ii)
evidence of services that the person received from a department, division, office or agency of the
of 2

executive office of health and human services or executive office of housing and livable
communities. The registrar and the state secretary shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding under section 42G ½ of chapter 51 to implement this paragraph, as appropriate.
For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
“Homeless”, shall have the same meaning as in section 103 of the Stewart B. McKinney
Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42 USC 11302(a), as amended.
“Unaccompanied homeless youth”, a person who: (i) is 24 years of age or younger; (ii) is
not in the physical custody or care of a parent or legal guardian; and (iii) lacks a fixed, regular
and adequate nighttime residence.
of 2